dev/postposition/postposition.ne.dix
  <!-- ध्ये; ध्ये; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ध्ये__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मूलक; मूलक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मूलक__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पटि; पटि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पटि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- समक्ष; समक्ष; 1 -->
    <pardef n="समक्ष__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तल-; तल-; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तल-__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मातहत; मातहत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मातहत__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हरु; हरु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हरु__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रहित; रहित; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रहित__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अनुसार; अनुसार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अनुसार__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- धरी; धरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="धरी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम्बन्धि; सम्बन्धि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सम्बन्धि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नेर; नेर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नेर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पछाडी; पछाडी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पछाडी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अनुकूल; अनुकूल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अनुकूल__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- माथी; माथी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="माथी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अर्न्तगत; अर्न्तगत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अर्न्तगत__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बारुला; बारुला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बारुला__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- को; को; 1 -->
    <pardef n="को__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कै; कै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पारि; पारि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पारि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सित; सित; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सित__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जश्ता; जश्ता; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जश्ता__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नीम्ति; नीम्ति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नीम्ति__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अघावै; अघावै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अघावै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मध्य; मध्य; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मध्य__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सँग; सँग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सँग__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- की; की; 1 -->
    <pardef n="की__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सँगै; सँगै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सँगै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वमोजिम; वमोजिम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वमोजिम__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भित्र; भित्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भित्र__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लागी; लागी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लागी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छेउ; छेउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छेउ__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भर; भर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अगि; अगि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अगि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रति; प्रति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रति__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भरी; भरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भरी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जत्ति; जत्ति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जत्ति__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="ध्ये"><i>ध्ये</i><par n="ध्ये__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="मूलक"><i>मूलक</i><par n="मूलक__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पटि"><i>पटि</i><par n="पटि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="समक्ष"><i>समक्ष</i><par n="समक्ष__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="तल-"><i>तल-</i><par n="तल-__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="मातहत"><i>मातहत</i><par n="मातहत__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="हरु"><i>हरु</i><par n="हरु__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="रहित"><i>रहित</i><par n="रहित__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुसार"><i>अनुसार</i><par n="अनुसार__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="धरी"><i>धरी</i><par n="धरी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्बन्धि"><i>सम्बन्धि</i><par n="सम्बन्धि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="नेर"><i>नेर</i><par n="नेर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पछाडी"><i>पछाडी</i><par n="पछाडी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुकूल"><i>अनुकूल</i><par n="अनुकूल__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="माथी"><i>माथी</i><par n="माथी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अर्न्तगत"><i>अर्न्तगत</i><par n="अर्न्तगत__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बारुला"><i>बारुला</i><par n="बारुला__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="को"><i>को</i><par n="को__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="कै"><i>कै</i><par n="कै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पारि"><i>पारि</i><par n="पारि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सित"><i>सित</i><par n="सित__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="जश्ता"><i>जश्ता</i><par n="जश्ता__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="नीम्ति"><i>नीम्ति</i><par n="नीम्ति__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अघावै"><i>अघावै</i><par n="अघावै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="मध्य"><i>मध्य</i><par n="मध्य__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सँग"><i>सँग</i><par n="सँग__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="की"><i>की</i><par n="की__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सँगै"><i>सँगै</i><par n="सँगै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वमोजिम"><i>वमोजिम</i><par n="वमोजिम__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="भित्र"><i>भित्र</i><par n="भित्र__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="लागी"><i>लागी</i><par n="लागी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="छेउ"><i>छेउ</i><par n="छेउ__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="भर"><i>भर</i><par n="भर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अगि"><i>अगि</i><par n="अगि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रति"><i>प्रति</i><par n="प्रति__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="भरी"><i>भरी</i><par n="भरी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="जत्ति"><i>जत्ति</i><par n="जत्ति__pst"/></e>
